Tennessee, session 114, HB1651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-106(f)(3), is amended by deleting
the subdivision and substituting:
(3) On the date of the statewide general election in 2026, and on the date of the
statewide general election every two (2) years thereafter, the expense allowance
established in subdivision (f)(1) must be adjusted to reflect the percentage increase in
the average consumer price index (all items-city average), as published by the United
States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the immediately preceding two-
year period. Each such adjustment under this subdivision (f)(3) must be rounded up to
the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100). The total adjustment must not
exceed fifty percent (50%) of the principal amount of the current allowance.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect November 3, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1651
010398
- 1 -